Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2551.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.177, No.175), known as The Administrative Code of 1929, is amended by adding a 1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526 section to read:Section 531. Certain Text-Based Communications Prohibited.--(a) A Commonwealth agency may not use a text-based communication to collect, or notify an individual about, an unpaid fine, fee, toll or other charge payable to the Commonwealth agency unless the agency has the explicit consent of the individual or the agency is providing free information to inform the recipient of the text of Commonwealth services that can benefit the recipient.(b) As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Commonwealth agency." As defined under section 102 of the act of October 15, 1980 (P.L.950, No.164), known as the "Commonwealth Attorneys Act.""Interactive mobile device." As defined in 75 Pa.C.S. § 102 (relating to definitions)."INTERACTIVE MOBILE DEVICE." A HANDHELD WIRELESS TELEPHONE, PERSONAL DIGITAL ASSISTANT, SMART PHONE, PORTABLE OR MOBILE COMPUTER OR SIMILAR DEVICE WHICH CAN BE USED FOR VOICE COMMUNICATION, TEXTING, EMAILING, BROWSING THE INTERNET, INSTANT MESSAGING, PLAYING GAMES, TAKING OR TRANSMITTING IMAGES, RECORDING OR BROADCASTING VIDEOS, CREATING OR SHARING SOCIAL MEDIA OR OTHERWISE SENDING OR RECEIVING ELECTRONIC DATA."Text-based communication." A text message, instant message , social media message or other written communication composed or received on an interactive mobile device. The term does not include electronic mail.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2551PN3653 - 2 - <--<--1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526272829